Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5493.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act may be cited as the "regulating governmental entities' use of automatic license plate readers act". (2) As used in this act: (a) "Alert data" means data held by the secretary of state, state or federal criminal or missing persons databases, and any license plate number manually entered into the automatic license plate reader system by a law enforcement officer who determined that the vehicle or an individual associated with the license plate number is relevant and material to an ongoing criminal or missing persons investigation. (b) "Automatic license plate reader system" means a system of 1 or more mobile or fixed automated high-speed cameras used in combination with computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into computer-readable data. (c) "Captured plate data" means GPS coordinates, dates and times, photographs, license plate numbers, and any other data captured by, derived from, or inferred from any automatic license plate reader system, including, but not limited to, make, model, color, or other motor vehicle characteristics. (d) "Governmental entity" means a department, agency, or political subdivision of this state, or an individual acting for or on behalf of a department, agency, or political subdivision of this state. (e) "Secured area" means an enclosed area to which access is limited and not open to the public and entry is obtainable through specific access control points only. Sec. 3. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), a governmental entity shall not use an automatic license plate reader system. (2) A governmental entity may use an automatic license plate reader system only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) For comparing captured plate data with alert data to identify a vehicle that is any of the following: (i) Uninsured or violating any vehicle insurance requirements. (ii) Unregistered or violating any vehicle registration requirements. (iii) Registered to an individual for whom there is an outstanding arrest warrant. (iv) Associated with a missing individual. (v) Reported as stolen. (vi) Relevant and material to an ongoing criminal investigation. (b) By parking enforcement entities for regulating the use of parking facilities. (c) For controlling access to secured areas. (d) For electronic toll collection. Sec. 5. (1) Captured plate data obtained for a purpose described in section 3(2) must not be used or shared for any other purpose and must not be retained for more than 14 days except for any of the following reasons: (a) As evidence furthering a purpose described in section 3(2). (b) Pursuant to a preservation request under section 9(1) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act. (c) Pursuant to a disclosure order under section 9(3) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act. (d) Pursuant to a judicially issued warrant. (e) As part of an ongoing investigation into a specific criminal act if captured plate data are confirmed as matching alert data and are destroyed at the conclusion of either of the following: (i) An investigation that does not result in any criminal charges being filed. (ii) Any criminal action undertaken in the matter involving the captured plate data, including the exhaustion or lapse of any appeal rights. (2) A law enforcement officer of a governmental entity that uses an automatic license plate reader system under section 3(2)(a) may manually enter license plate numbers into the automatic license plate reader system if that law enforcement officer determines that the vehicle or an individual associated with the license plate number is relevant and material to an ongoing criminal or missing persons investigation. The law enforcement officer must document in the automatic license plate reader system the reason for manually entering the license plate number. Sec. 7. A governmental entity that uses an automatic license plate reader system under this act shall do all of the following: (a) Consistent with the regulating automatic license plate readers act, adopt a policy governing the use of the automatic license plate reader system and conspicuously post the policy on the governmental entity's website. (b) Consistent with the regulating automatic license plate readers act, adopt a privacy policy to ensure that captured plate data are not shared in violation of this act or any other law and conspicuously post the privacy policy on the governmental entity's website. The privacy policy must do both of the following: (i) Subject to section 5(1), set a maximum amount of time that captured plate data can be stored by the governmental entity. (ii) Provide for the automatic deletion of captured plate data after the maximum amount of time described in subparagraph (i). (c) Submit a quarterly report on the governmental entity's automatic license plate reader practices and usage to the state or local body that governs the governmental entity. Each report must be conspicuously posted on the governmental entity's website. A report must not include any personally identifiable information. The report must include all of the following: (i) The number of license plates scanned. (ii) A list of the alert data against which captured plate data were checked, and the number of confirmed matches and the number of matches that upon further investigation did not correlate to any alert data. (iii) The number of alert data matches that resulted in arrest and prosecution. (iv) The number of preservation requests received under section 9(1) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act. (v) The number of preservation requests issued under section 9(1) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act, broken down by the number of preservation requests issued to governmental entities and operators of private automatic license plate reader systems. (vi) The number of disclosure orders received under section 9(2) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act. (vii) The number of disclosure orders applied for under section 9(2) of the regulating automatic license plate readers act, broken down into the following categories: (A) The number of applications for disclosure orders to governmental entities that were denied. (B) The number of disclosure orders to governmental entities resulting in arrest and prosecution. (C) The number of applications for disclosure orders to operators of private automatic license plate reader systems that were denied. (D) The number of orders for disclosure to operators of private automatic license plate reader systems resulting in arrest and prosecution. (viii) The number of manually entered license plate numbers under section 5(2), broken down by the reason justifying the entry, and the number of confirmed alert data matches and the number of manually entered license plate numbers that on further investigation did not correlate to any alert data. (ix) The number of times captured plate data were shared with external agencies. (x) The number of policy violations and misuse incidents during the reporting period, including whether any corrective actions were taken. (xi) Any changes in policy that affect privacy concerns. (d) Adopt storage security requirements that protect the captured plate data from unauthorized access. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5492 (request no. H05425'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.